Utah statutes.
19-7-105.   Privilege in administrative proceeding.
An environmental audit report is privileged in accordance with and to the
extent provided by Utah Rules of Evidence, Rule 508, Environmental Self-
Evaluation Privilege, in any administrative proceeding.
